California statutes. Insurance Code
 administrator or employer who has assumed administrative obligations pursuant to subdivision (d), by telephone, fax, electronic mail, or mail.

(2) Within 14 days of receipt of the information specified in paragraph (1) from the employer, the insurer shall send the written notice specified in paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA to those individuals.

(3) If an individual contacts his or her health insurer and indicates that he or she experienced a qualifying event that entitles him or her to the special election period described in paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA or any other special election provision of ARRA, the insurer shall provide the individual with the notice required under paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA or any other applicable provision of ARRA, regardless of whether the insurer receives or received
 information from the individual’s previous employer regarding that individual pursuant to Section 24100 of the Health and Safety Code. The insurer shall review the individual’s application for coverage under this special election notice to determine if the individual qualifies for the special election period and the premium assistance under ARRA. The insurer shall comply with paragraph (5) if the individual does not qualify for either the special election period or premium assistance under ARRA.

(4) The requirement under this subdivision to provide the written notice described in paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA to a qualified beneficiary and the requirement under paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) to provide a new opportunity to a
 qualified beneficiary to elect continuation coverage shall be deemed satisfied if a health insurer previously provided the written notice and additional election opportunity described in paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA to that qualified beneficiary prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph.

(5) If an individual does not qualify for either a special election period or the subsidy under ARRA, the insurer shall provide a written notice to that individual that shall include information on the right to appeal as set forth in Section 3001 of ARRA.

(6) A health insurer shall provide information on its publicly accessible Internet Web site regarding the premium assistance made available under ARRA
 and any special election period provided under that law. An insurer may fulfill this requirement by linking or otherwise directing consumers to the information regarding COBRA continuation coverage premium assistance located on the Internet Web site of the United States Department of Labor. The information required by this paragraph shall be located in a section of the insurer’s Internet Web site that is readily accessible to consumers, such as the Web site’s Frequently Asked Questions section.

 (k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a qualified beneficiary eligible for premium assistance under ARRA may elect to enroll in different coverage subject to the criteria provided under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA.

(l) A qualified beneficiary enrolled in continuation coverage as of February 17, 2009, who is eligible for premium
 assistance under ARRA may request application of the premium assistance as of March 1, 2009, or later, consistent with ARRA.

(m) An insurer that receives an election notice from a qualified beneficiary eligible for premium assistance under ARRA, pursuant to subdivision (h), shall be considered a person entitled to reimbursement, as defined in Section 6432(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA.

(n) (1) For purposes of compliance with ARRA, in the absence of guidance from, or if specifically required for state-only continuation coverage by, the United States Department of Labor, the Internal Revenue Service, or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, an insurer may request verification of the involuntary termination of a covered employee’s employment from the covered employee’s former
 employer or the qualified beneficiary seeking premium assistance under ARRA.

(2) An insurer that requests verification pursuant to paragraph (1) directly from a covered employee’s former employer shall do so by providing a written notice to the employer. This written notice shall be sent by mail or facsimile to the covered employee’s former employer within seven business days from the date the insurer receives the qualified beneficiary’s election notice pursuant to subdivision (h). Within 10 calendar days of receipt of written notice required by this paragraph, the former employer shall furnish to the insurer written verification as to whether the covered employee’s employment was involuntarily terminated.

(3) A qualified beneficiary requesting premium assistance under ARRA may furnish to the insurer a written document or other information from the covered employee’s former
 employer indicating that the covered employee’s employment was involuntarily terminated. This document or information shall be deemed sufficient by the insurer to establish that the covered employee’s employment was involuntarily terminated for purposes of ARRA, unless the insurer makes a reasonable and timely determination that the documents or information provided by the qualified beneficiary are legally insufficient to establish involuntary termination of employment.

(4) If an insurer requests verification pursuant to this subdivision and cannot verify involuntary termination of employment within 14 business days from the date the employer receives the verification request or from the date the insurer receives documentation or other information from the qualified beneficiary pursuant to paragraph (3), the insurer shall either provide continuation coverage with the federal premium assistance to the qualified beneficiary or send the qualified
 beneficiary a denial letter which shall include notice of his or her right to appeal that determination pursuant to ARRA.

(5) No person shall intentionally delay verification of involuntary termination of employment under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 24, Sec. 8.   (SB 838)   Effective June 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.56.

A qualified beneficiary electing continuation coverage shall pay to the disability insurer, on or before the due date of each payment but not more frequently than on a monthly basis, not more than 110 percent of the applicable rate charged for a covered employee or, in the case of dependent coverage, not more than 110 percent of the applicable rate charged to a similarly situated individual under the group benefit plan being continued under the group contract. In the case of a qualified beneficiary who is determined to be disabled pursuant to Title II or Title XVI of the United States Social Security Act, the qualified beneficiary shall be required to pay to the insurer an amount no greater than 150 percent of the group rate after the first 18 months of continuation coverage provided pursuant to this section. In no case shall an insurer charge an employer an additional fee for administering Cal-COBRA other than those incorporated in the risk adjusted employee risk rate as provided for in subdivision (t) of Section 10700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 107, Sec. 20.   Effective July 6, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.57.

(a) The continuation coverage provided pursuant to this article shall terminate at the first to occur of the following:

(1) In the case of a qualified beneficiary who is eligible for continuation coverage pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 10128.51, the date 36 months after the date the qualified beneficiary’s benefits under the contract would otherwise have terminated because of a qualifying event.

(2) Except as provided in Section 3001 of ARRA, the end of the period for which premium payments were made, if the qualified beneficiary ceases to make payments or fails to make timely payments of a
 required premium, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the policy or contract. In the case of nonpayment of premiums, reinstatement shall be governed by the terms and conditions of the policy or contract and by Section 3001 of ARRA, if applicable.

(3) In the case of a qualified beneficiary who is eligible to continuation coverage pursuant to paragraph (1), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 10116.51, the date 36 months after the date the qualified beneficiary’s benefits under the contract would otherwise have terminated by reason of a qualifying event.

(4) The requirements of this article no longer apply to the qualified beneficiary pursuant to the provisions of Section 10128.52.

(5) In the case of a qualified beneficiary who is eligible for continuation coverage pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (d) of Section 10128.51, and determined, under Title II or Title XVI of the Social Security Act, to be disabled any time during the first 60 days of continuation coverage, and the spouse or dependent who has elected coverage pursuant to this article, the date 36 months after the date the qualified beneficiary’s benefits under the contract would otherwise have terminated because of a qualifying event. The qualified beneficiary shall notify the insurer, or the employer or administrator that contracts to perform administrative services, of the social security determination within 60 days of the date of the determination letter and prior to the end of the original 36-month continuation coverage period in order to be eligible for coverage pursuant to this subdivision. If the qualified beneficiary is no longer disabled under Title II or Title XVI of the Social Security Act, the benefits provided in this paragraph shall terminate on the later of the date provided by paragraph (1), or the month that
 begins more than 31 days after the date of the final determination under Title II or Title XVI of the United States Social Security Act that the qualified beneficiary is no longer disabled. A qualified beneficiary eligible for 36 months of continuation coverage as a result of a disability shall notify the insurer, or the employer or administrator that contracts to perform the notice and administrative services, within 30 days of a determination that the qualified beneficiary is no longer disabled.

(6) In the case of a qualified beneficiary who is initially eligible for and elects continuation coverage pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 10128.51, but who has another qualifying event, as described in paragraph (1), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 10128.51, within 36 months of the date of the first qualifying event, and has notified the insurer, or employer or administrator under contract to provide
 administrative services, of the second qualifying event within 60 days of the date of the second qualifying event, the date 36 months after the date of the first qualifying event.

(7) The employer, or any successor employer or purchaser of the employer, ceases to provide any group benefit plan to his or her employees.

(8) The qualified beneficiary moves out of the insurer’s service area, or the qualified beneficiary commits fraud or deception in the use of benefits.

(b) If the group benefits contracts between the insurer and the employer is terminated prior to the date the qualified beneficiary’s continuation coverage would terminate pursuant to this section, coverage under the prior plan shall terminate and the qualified beneficiary may elect continuation coverage under the subsequent group benefit plan, if any,
 pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 10128.53 and subdivision (c) of Section 10128.54.

(c) The amendments made to this section by Assembly Bill 1401 of the 2001–02 Regular Session shall apply to individuals who begin receiving continuation coverage under this article on or after January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 24, Sec. 9.   (SB 838)   Effective June 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.58.

A disability insurer subject to this article shall not be obligated to provide continuation coverage to a qualified beneficiary pursuant to this article if an insured fails to make the notification required by Section 10128.54, or if the employer of the insured fails to comply with Section 10128.55.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 107, Sec. 22.   Effective July 6, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.59.

(a) A health insurer that provides coverage under a group benefit plan to an employer shall offer an insured who has exhausted continuation coverage under COBRA the opportunity to continue coverage for up to 36 months from the date the insured’s continuation coverage began if the insured is entitled to less than 36 months of continuation coverage under COBRA. The health insurer shall offer coverage pursuant to terms of this article, including the rate limitations contained in Section 10128.56.

(b) Notification of the coverage available under this section shall be included in the notice of the pending termination of COBRA coverage that is required to be provided to COBRA beneficiaries and that is required to be provided under Section 10128.54.

(c) For purposes of this section, “COBRA” means Section 4980B of Title 26 of the United States Code, Sections 1161 et seq. of Title 29 of the United States Code, and Section 300bb of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, CHAMPUS supplement, long-term care, Medicare supplement, dental-only, or vision-only insurance policies.

(e) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2003, and shall apply to individuals who begin receiving COBRA coverage on or after January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 794, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative September 1, 2003, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer [10129. - 10133.14.]

10129.

Sections 10130 and 10131 do not apply to group life policies, to group disability policies, or to individual disability policies providing a benefit for loss of time and which are noncancellable and guaranteed renewable for not less than five years, when any of such group life policies, group disability policies or individual disability policies expressly provide that benefits payable thereunder are not assignable, and in such case the benefits shall be paid only as provided in the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 904.)
-------------------------------------------

10129.5.

Sections 10130 and 10131 do not apply to annuity contracts which are within the scope of Section 401(g) of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2061.)
-------------------------------------------

10130.

A life or disability policy may pass by transfer, will or succession to any person, whether or not the transferee has an insurable interest. Such transferee may recover upon it whatever the insured might have recovered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.

Notice to an insurer of a transfer of a life or disability policy is not necessary to preserve the validity of the policy unless expressly required by the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10132.

The beneficiary under a life policy which provides for the payment of its proceeds in periodical installments, may be restrained by its provisions from disposing of or incumbering his interest in any such installment prior to the date when it becomes due and payable by the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.

(a) Upon written consent of the insured first obtained with respect to a particular claim, any disability insurer shall pay group insurance benefits contingent upon, or for expenses incurred on account of, hospitalization or medical or surgical aid to the person or persons furnishing the hospitalization or medical or surgical aid, or, on and after January 1, 1994, to the person or persons having paid for the hospitalization or medical or surgical aid, but the amount of any such payment shall not exceed the amount of benefit provided by the policy with respect to the service or billing of the provider of aid, and the amount of the payments pursuant to one or more assignments shall not exceed the amount of expenses incurred on account of the hospitalization or medical or surgical aid. Payments so made shall discharge the insurer’s obligation with respect to the amount so paid.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an insurer to furnish or directly provide services of hospitals, or psychiatric health facilities, as defined in Section 1250.2 of the Health and Safety Code, or physicians and surgeons, or psychologists or in any manner to direct, participate in, or control the selection of the hospital or health facility or physician and surgeon or psychologist from whom the insured secures services or exercise medical or dental or psychological professional judgment, except that an insurer may negotiate and enter into contracts for alternative rates of payment with institutional providers, and offer the benefit of these alternative rates to insureds who select those providers.

(c) Alternatively, insurers may, by agreement with group policyholders, limit payments under a policy to services secured by insureds from institutional providers, and after July 1, 1983, from professional providers, charging alternative rates pursuant to contract with the insurer.

(d) Pursuant to subdivision (c), when alternate rates of payment to providers are applicable to contracts with group policyholders, the contracts shall include programs for the continuous review of the quality of care, performance of medical or psychological personnel included in the plan, utilization of services and facilities, and costs, by professionally recognized unrelated third parties utilizing in the case of professional providers similarly licensed providers for each medical, psychological, or dental service covered under the plan and utilizing in the case of institutional providers appropriate professional providers. All provisions of the laws of the state relating to immunity from liability and discovery privileges for medical, psychological, and dental peer review shall apply to the licensed providers performing the foregoing activities.

(e) On or after July 1, 1983, the amendments made to this section during the 1982 portion of the 1981–82 Regular Session, shall also be applicable with respect to both professional and institutional providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 744, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.1.

Insurers shall provide group policyholders with a current roster of institutional and professional providers under contract to provide services at alternative rates under their group policy and shall also make such lists available for public inspection during regular business hours at the insurer’s or plan’s principal office within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 10.5.   Effective September 30, 1982.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 82 of Ch. 1594.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.15.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2016, a health insurer that contracts with providers for alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133 shall publish and maintain provider directory or directories with information on contracting providers that deliver health care services to the insurer’s insureds, including those that accept new patients. A provider directory shall not list or include information on a provider that is not currently under contract with the insurer.

(b) An insurer shall provide the online directory or directories for the specific network offered for each product using a consistent method of network and product naming, numbering, or other classification
 method that ensures the public, insureds, potential insureds, the department, and other state or federal agencies can easily identify the networks and insurer products in which a provider participates. By July 31, 2017, or 12 months after the date provider directory standards are developed under subdivision (k), whichever occurs later, an insurer shall use the naming, numbering, or classification method developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (k).

(c) (1) An online provider directory or directories shall be available on the insurer’s internet website to the public, potential insureds, insureds, and providers without any restrictions or limitations. The directory or directories shall be accessible without any requirement that an individual seeking the directory information demonstrate coverage with the insurer,
 indicate interest in obtaining coverage with the insurer, provide a member identification or policy number, provide any other identifying information, or create or access an account.

(2) The online provider directory or directories shall be accessible on the insurer’s public internet website through an identifiable link or tab and in a manner that is accessible and searchable by insureds, potential insureds, the public, and providers. By July 1, 2017, or 12 months after the date provider directory standards are developed under subdivision (k), whichever occurs later, the insurer’s public internet website shall allow provider searches by, at a minimum, name, practice address, city, ZIP Code, California license number, National Provider Identifier number, admitting privileges to an identified hospital, product, tier, provider language
 or languages, provider group, hospital name, facility name, or clinic name, as appropriate.

(d) (1) An insurer shall allow insureds, potential insureds, providers, and members of the public to request a printed copy of the provider directory or directories by contacting the insurer through the insurer’s toll-free telephone number, electronically, or in writing. A printed copy of the provider directory or directories shall include the information required in subdivisions (h) and (i). The printed copy of the provider directory or directories shall be provided to the requester by mail postmarked no later than five business days following the date of the request and may be limited to the geographic region in which the requester resides or works or intends to reside or work.

(2) An insurer shall update its printed provider directory or directories at least quarterly, or more frequently, if required by federal law.

(e) (1) The insurer shall update the online provider directory or directories, at least weekly, or more frequently, if required by federal law, when informed of and upon confirmation by the insurer of any of the following:

(A) A contracting provider is no longer accepting new patients for that product, or an individual provider within a provider group is no longer accepting new patients.

(B) A contracted provider is no longer under contract for a particular product.

(C) A provider’s practice
 location or other information required under subdivision (h) or (i) has changed.

(D) Upon the completion of the investigation described in subdivision (o), a change is necessary based on an insured complaint that a provider was not accepting new patients, was otherwise not available, or whose contact information was listed incorrectly.

(E) Any other information that affects the content or accuracy of the provider directory or directories.

(2) Upon confirmation of any of the following, the insurer shall delete a provider from the directory or directories when:

(A) A provider has retired or otherwise has ceased to practice.

(B) A provider or provider group is no longer under contract with the insurer for any reason.

(C) The contracting provider group has informed the insurer that the provider is no longer associated with the provider group and is no longer under contract with the insurer.

(f) The provider directory or directories shall include both an email address and a telephone number for members of the public and providers to notify the insurer if the provider directory information appears to be inaccurate. This information shall be disclosed prominently in the directory or directories and on the insurer’s internet website.

(g) The provider directory or directories shall include the following disclosures informing insureds
 that they are entitled to both of the following:

(1) Language interpreter services, at no cost to the insured, including how to obtain interpretation services in accordance with Section 10133.8.

(2) Full and equal access to covered services, including insureds with disabilities as required under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.

(h) The insurer and a specialized mental health insurer shall include all of the following information in the provider directory or directories:

(1) The provider’s name, practice location or locations, and contact information.

(2) Type of practitioner.

(3) National Provider Identifier number.

(4) California license number and type of license.

(5) The area of specialty, including board certification, if any.

(6) The provider’s office email address, if available.

(7) The name of each affiliated provider group currently under contract with the insurer through which the provider sees insureds.

(8) A listing for each of the following providers that are under contract with the insurer:

(A) For physicians and surgeons, the provider group, and admitting privileges, if any, at hospitals contracted with the insurer.

(B) Nurse practitioners, physician assistants, psychologists, acupuncturists, optometrists, podiatrists, chiropractors, licensed clinical social workers, marriage and family therapists, professional clinical counselors, qualified autism service providers, as defined in Section 4999.200 of the Business and Professions Code, nurse midwives, and dentists.

(C) For federally qualified health centers or primary care clinics, the name of the federally
 qualified health center or clinic.

(D) For a provider described in subparagraph (A) or (B) who
 is employed by a federally qualified health center or primary care clinic, and to the extent their services may be accessed and are covered through the contract with the insurer, the name of the provider, and the name of the federally qualified health center or clinic.

(E) Facilities, including, but not limited to, general acute care hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, urgent care clinics, ambulatory surgery centers, inpatient hospice, residential care facilities, and inpatient rehabilitation facilities.

(F) Pharmacies, clinical laboratories, imaging centers, and other facilities providing contracted health care services.

(9) The provider directory or directories may note that authorization or
 referral may be required to access some providers.

(10) Non-English language, if any, spoken by a health care provider or other medical professional as well as non-English language spoken by a qualified medical interpreter, in accordance with Section 10133.8, if any, on the provider’s staff.

(11) Identification of providers who no longer accept new patients for some or all of the insurer’s products.

(12) The network tier to which the provider is assigned, if the provider is not in the lowest tier, as applicable. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the use of network tiers other than contract and noncontracting tiers.

(13) All other information
 necessary to conduct a search pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(i) A vision, dental, or other specialized insurer, except for a specialized mental health insurer, shall include all of the following information for each provider directory or directories used by the insurer for its networks:

(1) The provider’s name, practice location or locations, and contact information.

(2) Type of practitioner.

(3) National Provider Identifier number.

(4) California license number and type of license, if applicable.

(5) The area of specialty,
 including board certification, or other
 accreditation, if any.

(6) The provider’s office email address, if available.

(7) The name of each affiliated provider group or specialty insurer practice group currently under contract with the insurer through which the provider sees insureds.

(8) The names of each allied health care professional to the extent there is a direct contract for those services covered through a contract with the insurer.

(9) The non-English language, if any, spoken by a health care provider or other medical professional as well as non-English language spoken by a qualified medical interpreter, in accordance with Section 10133.8, if any, on the provider’s staff.

(10) Identification of providers who no longer accept new patients for some or all of the insurer’s products.

(11) All other applicable information necessary to conduct a provider search pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(j) (1) The contract between the insurer and a provider shall include a requirement that the provider inform the insurer within five business days when either of the following occurs:

(A) The provider is not accepting new patients.

(B) If the provider had previously not accepted new patients, the provider is currently accepting new patients.

(2) If a provider who is not accepting new patients is contacted by an insured or potential insured seeking to become a new patient, the provider shall direct the insurer or potential insured to both the insurer for additional assistance in finding a provider and to the department to report any inaccuracy with the insurer’s directory or directories.

(3) If an insured or potential insured informs an insurer of a possible inaccuracy in the provider directory or directories, the insurer shall promptly investigate and, if necessary, undertake corrective action within 30 business days to ensure the accuracy of the directory or directories.

(k) (1) On or before December 31, 2016, the department shall develop
 uniform provider directory standards to permit consistency in accordance with subdivision (b) and paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and development of a multiplan directory by another entity. Those standards shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until January 1, 2021. No more than two revisions of those standards shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) In developing the standards under this subdivision, the department shall seek input from interested parties throughout the process of developing the standards and shall hold at least one public meeting. The department shall
 take into consideration any requirements for provider directories established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) By July 31, 2017, or 12 months after the date provider directory standards are developed under this subdivision, whichever occurs later, an insurer shall use the standards developed by the department for each product offered by the insurer.

(l) (1) An insurer shall take appropriate steps to ensure the accuracy of the information concerning each provider listed in the insurer’s provider directory or directories in accordance with this section, and shall, at least annually, review and update the entire provider directory or directories for each product offered. Each calendar
 year the insurer shall notify all contracted providers described in subdivisions (h) and (i) as follows:

(A) For individual providers who are not affiliated with a provider group described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (h) and providers described in subdivision (i), the insurer shall notify each provider at least once every six months.

(B) For all other providers described in subdivision (h) who are not subject to the requirements of subparagraph (A), the insurer shall notify its contracted providers to ensure that all of the providers are contacted by the insurer at least once annually.

(2) The notification shall include all of the following:

(A) The information the insurer has in its directory or directories regarding the provider or provider group, including a list of networks and products that include the contracted provider or provider group.

(B) A statement that the failure to respond to the notification may result in a delay of payment or reimbursement of a claim pursuant to subdivision (p).

(C) Instructions on how the provider or provider group can update the information in the provider directory or directories using the online interface developed pursuant to subdivision (m).

(3) The insurer shall require an affirmative response from the provider or provider group acknowledging that the notification was received. The provider or provider
 group shall confirm that the information in the provider directory or directories is current and accurate or update the information required to be in the directory or directories pursuant to this section, including whether or not the provider group is accepting new patients for each product.

(4) If the insurer does not receive an affirmative response and confirmation from the provider that the information is current and accurate or, as an alternative, updates any information required to be in the directory or directories pursuant to this section, within 30 business days, the insurer shall take no more than 15 business days to verify whether the provider’s information is correct or requires updates. The insurer shall document the receipt and outcome of each attempt to verify the information. If the insurer is unable to verify whether
 the provider’s information is correct or requires updates, the insurer shall notify the provider 10 business days in advance of removal that the provider will be removed from the directory or directories. The provider shall be removed from the directory or directories at the next required update of the provider directory or directories after the 10-business day notice period. A provider shall not be removed from the provider directory or directories if they respond before the end of the 10-business day notice period.

(5) General acute care hospitals shall be exempt from the requirements in paragraphs (3) and (4).

(m) An insurer shall establish policies and procedures with regard to the regular updating of its provider directory or directories, including the weekly, quarterly, and
 annual updates required pursuant to this section, or more frequently, if required by federal law or guidance.

(1) The policies and procedures described under this subdivision shall be submitted by an insurer annually to the department for approval and in a format described by the department.

(2) Every insurer shall ensure processes are in place to allow providers to promptly verify or submit changes to the information required to be in the directory or directories pursuant to this section.
 Those processes shall, at a minimum, include an online interface for providers to submit verification or changes electronically and shall generate an acknowledgment of receipt from the insurer. Providers shall verify or submit changes to information required to be in the directory or directories pursuant to this section using the process required by the insurer.

(3) The insurer shall establish and maintain a process for insureds, potential insureds, other providers, and the public to identify and report possible inaccurate, incomplete, or misleading information currently listed in the insurer’s provider directory or directories. This process shall, at a minimum, include a telephone number and a dedicated email address at which the insurer will accept these reports, as well as a hyperlink on the insurer’s provider directory
 internet website linking to a form where the information can be reported directly to the insurer through its internet website.

(n) (1) This section does not prohibit an insurer from requiring its provider groups or contracting specialized health insurers to provide information to the insurer that is required by the insurer to satisfy the requirements of this section for each of the providers that contract with the provider group or contracting specialized health insurer. This responsibility shall be specifically documented in a written contract between the insurer and the provider group or contracting specialized health insurer.

(2) If an insurer requires its contracting provider groups or contracting specialized health insurers to provide the insurer with information
 described in paragraph (1), the insurer shall continue to retain responsibility for ensuring that the requirements of this section are satisfied.

(3) A provider group may terminate a contract with a provider for a pattern or repeated failure of the provider to update the information required to be in the directory or directories pursuant to this section.

(4) A provider group is not subject to the payment delay described in subdivision (p) if all of the following occurs:

(A) A provider does not respond to the provider group’s attempt to verify the provider’s information. As used in this paragraph, “verify” means to contact the provider in writing, electronically, and by telephone to confirm whether the provider’s
 information is correct or requires updates.

(B) The provider group documents its efforts to verify the provider’s information.

(C) The provider group reports to the insurer that the provider should be deleted from the provider group in the insurer’s provider directory or directories.

(5) Section 10133.65, known as the Health Care Providers’ Bill of Rights, applies to any material change to a provider contract pursuant to this section.

(o) (1) Whenever an insurer receives a report indicating that information listed in its provider directory or directories is inaccurate, the insurer shall promptly investigate the reported inaccuracy
 and, no later than 30 business days following receipt of the report, either verify the accuracy of the information or update the information in its provider directory or directories, as applicable.

(2) When investigating a report regarding its provider directory or directories, the insurer shall, at a minimum, do the following:

(A) Contact the affected provider no later than five business days following receipt of the report.

(B) Document the receipt and outcome of each report. The documentation shall include the provider’s name, location, and a description of the insurer’s investigation, the outcome of the investigation, and any changes or updates made to its provider directory or directories.

(C) If changes to an insurer’s provider directory or directories are required as a result of the insurer’s investigation, the changes to the online provider directory or directories shall be made no later than the next scheduled weekly update, or the update immediately following that update, or sooner if required by federal law or regulations. For printed provider directories, the change shall be made no later than the next required update, or sooner if required by federal law or regulations.
